Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 30. Tax Increment Financing
154.30-060.
Commonwealth Participation Program for Mixed-Use Redevelopment in Blighted Urban Areas — Definitions — Criteria for state participation — Qualifying expenditures — Authority review — Required determinations by the authority — Pledge limitations — Tax incentive agreement required.

The Commonwealth Participation Program for Mixed-Use Redevelopment in Blighted Urban Areas is hereby established.

State participation under this program shall be limited to the support of approved public infrastructure costs and costs associated with land preparation, demolition, and clearance determined to be necessary to support private investment or private development projects that benefit the public, where project economics are unable to support or secure necessary financing to undertake the public improvements, land preparation, demolition, and clearance.

As used in this section:

“Mixed-use” means a project:

That includes at least two (2) qualified uses, each of which comprises at least twenty percent (20%) of the total finished square footage of the proposed project or represents at least twenty percent (20%) of the total capital investment; or

That includes at least three (3) qualified uses:

One (1) of which comprises at least twenty percent (20%) of the total finished square footage of the proposed project or represents at least twenty percent (20%) of the total capital investment; and

The remainder of which, when combined, jointly comprise at least twenty percent (20%) of the total finished square footage of the proposed project or represent at least twenty percent (20%) of the total capital investment;

“Qualified use” means:

Retail;

Residential;

Office;

Restaurant; or

Hospitality; and

“Retail” means an establishment predominantly engaged in the sale of tangible personal property subject to the tax imposed by KRS Chapter 139, but shall not include restaurants.

To be considered for state participation under this program, a project shall:

Be located in an area that has three (3) or more of the conditions listed in KRS 65.7049(3)(a), or be a project described in KRS 65.7049(3)(b);

Be a mixed-use project;

Represent new economic activity in the Commonwealth;

Result in a capital investment between twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) and two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000);

Not include any retail establishment that exceeds twenty thousand (20,000) square feet of finished square footage;

Include pedestrian amenities and public space; and

Result in a net positive economic impact to the Commonwealth, taking into consideration any substantial adverse impact on existing Commonwealth businesses. The net positive impact shall be certified to the authority as required by KRS 154.30-030(6)(b).

The following costs may be recovered pursuant to this section:

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of approved public infrastructure costs; and

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of expenses for land preparation, demolition, and clearance necessary for the development to occur.

The commission shall review the application, the certification required by KRS 154.30-030, and supporting information as provided in KRS 154.30-030.

The authority shall specifically identify the state taxes from which incremental revenues will be pledged. The authority may pledge up to eighty percent (80%) of the incremental revenues from the identified state tax revenues from the footprint of the project, provided that the maximum amount of incremental revenues that may be pledged for a project during the term of the tax incentive agreement from all approved state taxes shall not exceed the costs and expenses determined under subsection (5) of this section.

As part of the approval process, the authority shall determine the following:

The footprint of the project;

That the proposed project meets the requirements established by subsection (4) of this section;

The maximum amount of approved public infrastructure costs and expenses for land preparation, demolition, and clearance;

That the local revenues pledged to support the public infrastructure of the project and local revenues pledged to support the overall project are of a sufficient amount to warrant participation of the Commonwealth in the project;

The termination date of the tax incentive agreement; and

Any adjustments to be made to old revenues, in determining incremental revenues during each year of the term of the tax incentive agreement.

If state income taxes or local occupational licenses taxes are included for a project that includes office space, the authority shall consider the impact of pledging these taxes on the ability to utilize other economic development projects at a later date.

The pledge of state incremental tax revenues of the Commonwealth by the authority shall be implemented through the execution of a tax incentive agreement between the Commonwealth and the agency, city, or county in accordance with KRS 154.30-070.

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 19, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 62, § 4, effective June 8, 2011; 2014, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 174, § 2, effective April 10, 2017.

154.30-070.
Terms and conditions of tax incentive agreements to be negotiated between authority and agency — Provisions of agreement — Pledge of incremental revenues superior to other pledges of revenues — Renewal and discontinuance of agreement.

The terms and conditions of the tax incentive agreement shall be negotiated between the authority and the agency. The tax incentive agreement shall include but not be limited to the following provisions:

Identification of the parties to the tax incentive agreement and the duties and responsibilities of each party to the tax incentive agreement;

The specific identification of the state tax revenues, by type of tax, to be released or pledged by the Commonwealth for the project;

A detailed summary of old revenues collected and projected new revenues for the Commonwealth on an annual basis for the term of the tax incentive agreement; and
(c) 1.

A detailed summary of old revenues collected and projected new revenues for the Commonwealth on an annual basis for the term of the tax incentive agreement; and

The maximum amount of incremental revenue to be released by the Commonwealth and the maximum number of years the pledge of incremental revenues will be effective;

A detailed description of each project that is the subject of the tax incentive agreement, including an estimate of the costs of construction or acquisition and development;

Identification of the project footprint from which the state incremental revenues pledged by the Commonwealth are to be derived;

The approved public infrastructure costs and, when applicable, approved signature project costs, approved financing costs, and approved costs relating to land preparation, demolition, and clearance that may be recovered;

The minimum capital investment required, the date by which the minimum capital investment is expected to occur, and a provision stating that failure of the approved company to meet the minimum capital investment established by KRS 154.30-040, 154.30-050, or 154.30-060 on or before the activation date shall result in cancellation of the tax incentive agreement;

Terms of default and remedies, provided that no remedy shall permit the withholding by any party to the tax incentive agreement of any incremental revenues if increment bonds are outstanding that are secured by a pledge of those incremental revenues;

The termination date;

A requirement that the agency, city, or county annually certify to the authority the use of incremental revenues for the payment of approved project costs within the development area;

A requirement that the agency shall utilize the portion of incremental revenues pledged pursuant to a tax incentive agreement that exceeds, in a given year, the amounts needed to:

Pay the current financing costs; and

Maintain a fully funded reserve;

A requirement that the agency, city, or county make periodic accountings to the authority;

A requirement that the authority monitor and verify approved public infrastructure costs, financing costs and approved signature project costs and minimum capital investment; and

For a signature project, the eligible refund amount or percentage for the sales tax as permitted under KRS 139.515, and as determined by the authority pursuant to KRS 65.7075(6); and

Any other provisions not inconsistent with this subchapter deemed necessary or appropriate by the parties to the tax incentive agreement.

Any pledge of incremental revenues in a tax incentive agreement shall be superior to any other pledge of revenues for any other purpose and shall, from the activation date to the termination date, supersede any statute or ordinance regarding the application or use of incremental revenues. An ordinance in conflict with a tax incentive agreement shall not be adopted while any increment bonds secured by that pledge remain outstanding. Ordinances pledging increments on a subordinate basis to any existing pledges may be adopted.

Any tax incentive agreement shall be made on the basis of automatic year-to-year renewals, with the option to discontinue upon sixty (60) days’ notice before the end of any annual termination date of the tax incentive agreement.

to provide for the retirement or defeasance of all or a portion of the remaining financing costs related to approved public infrastructure costs, and approved signature project costs secured by the incremental revenues;

HISTORY:
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 20, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 199, § 28, effective July 14, 2018.

154.30-080.
Requirement that minimal capital investment be made prior to the release of incremental revenues — Escrow account — Cancellation if agency fails to meet minimum investment — Duties of authority to monitor agreements and track revenues.

Prior to any incremental revenues being released by the Commonwealth for any project, the authority shall certify that the minimum capital investment has been made as required by the tax incentive agreement.
(1) (a)

Prior to any incremental revenues being released by the Commonwealth for any project, the authority shall certify that the minimum capital investment has been made as required by the tax incentive agreement.

Incremental revenues received after the activation date but prior to certification of the minimum capital investment shall be retained by the Commonwealth until the minimum capital investment is certified by the authority. The incremental revenues shall be released to the agency upon certification. If the minimum capital investment is not certified within the time period established by the authority, the incremental revenues shall be forfeited to the Commonwealth.

The tax incentive agreement shall be canceled and the approved agency shall not be eligible for incentives if the agency fails to meet the minimum capital investment established by KRS 154.30-040, 154.30-050, or 154.30-060 on the activation date.

The authority shall monitor all tax incentive agreements and shall verify for each project expenditure identified as approved public infrastructure costs and where applicable, financing costs, approved signature project costs and expenses for land preparation, demolition and clearance.

The authority and the department shall track the amount of incremental revenues released to each agency under each tax incentive agreement.

HISTORY:
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 21, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 199, § 29, effective July 14, 2018.

154.30-090.
Annual disbursement of tax incremental revenues.

Any agency that enters into a tax incentive agreement for the release of incremental revenues shall, after each calendar year, in which a tax incentive agreement is in effect, notify the authority that incremental revenues are due, and in consultation with the authority, the agency shall determine the amount of the incremental revenues due from the Commonwealth.
(1) (a)

Any agency that enters into a tax incentive agreement for the release of incremental revenues shall, after each calendar year, in which a tax incentive agreement is in effect, notify the authority that incremental revenues are due, and in consultation with the authority, the agency shall determine the amount of the incremental revenues due from the Commonwealth.

The agency shall present to the authority the total increment due from the Commonwealth. The authority shall review and verify the information submitted and shall certify the verified amount.

Upon certification of the total incremental revenues due from the Commonwealth by the authority, the Department of Revenue shall transfer the incremental revenues to a tax increment financing account established and administered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for payment of the Commonwealth’s portion of the incremental revenues. Prior to disbursement by the Finance and Administration Cabinet of the funds from the tax increment financing account, the authority shall notify the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the agency is in compliance with the terms of the tax incentive agreement. Upon notification, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall release to the agency the Commonwealth’s portion of the total incremental revenues due under the tax incentive agreement.

The Department of Revenue shall have no obligation to refund or otherwise return any of the incremental revenues to the taxpayer from whom the incremental revenues arose or are attributable. Further, no additional incremental revenues resulting from audit, amended returns, or other activity for any period shall be transferred to the tax increment financing account after the initial release to the agency of the Commonwealth’s increment for that period.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 22, effective July 15, 2008.